Hawaii statutes.
[§708-835.9] Theft of urn. (1) A
person commits the offense of theft of urn if the person:

(a) Obtains an urn through any means described in
section 708-830; or

(b) Violates section 445-233 in regard to an urn.

(2) For the purposes of this section,
"urn" means a container that is or has been used to hold human ashes.

(3) Theft of urn is a class C felony. [L 2016,
c 199, §1]

Cross References

Scrap dealer requirements, see chapter 445, part X.

COMMENTARY ON §708-835.9

Act 199, Session Laws 2016, added this section, establishing
the offense of theft of an urn, which includes obtaining an urn through any
means described under the offense of theft under §708-830 or violating the
statement requirements of scrap dealers under §445-233, as a class C felony.
The legislature found that Act 199 would help to prevent persons from stealing
urns from cemeteries, especially for the metal redemption value of the urns.
Senate Standing Committee Report No. 3463, Conference Committee Report No.
60-16.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next